Alabama, session 2026rs, HB451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this act, the term
"credit card" means a line of credit issued by a domestic
lender or credit card bank.
(b) To provide for convenience in making purchases of
tangible personal property or services approved by the judge
of probate, the Judge of Probate of Montgomery County may
establish procedures to make purchases through use of a credit
card issued to the Montgomery County Probate Court's Office.
The judge of probate may adopt written policy and procedures
governing the use of credit cards which, at a minimum, shall
include each of the following:
(1) A monetary limit on the amount of any individual
purchase which may be made with a credit card.
(2) A monetary limit on the total monthly amount that
may be purchased with a credit card, taking into consideration
the monetary limit of the discretionary fund used.
(3) Procedures to ensure that only the judge of probate
or his or her designee have access to any credit card, credit
card numbers, access codes, or security codes.
(4) Procedures to keep accurate records of all
purchases made with a credit card, which shall be periodically
reviewed during required audits.
Page 1

reviewed during required audits.
HB451 Enrolled
(5) Procedures to ensure that all credit card bills are
carefully reviewed by the judge of probate each month to
ensure that no unauthorized charges appear on the bill.
(6) Procedures to ensure that all credit card bills are
paid in full on a timely basis each month to avoid service
charges, late fees, or interest payments.
(7) The judge of probate shall select the credit card
provider or providers taking into consideration each of the
following:
a. Whether the credit card issuer requires an annual
fee for using the card.
b. Whether the credit card issuer offers rewards or
rebates based upon purchases made using the account.
c. What interest rates, service charges, finance
charges, or late fees will be assessed in the event a bill
from the credit card issuer is paid late or the balance is not
paid in full.
d. Whether penalties or fees will be assessed against
the judge of probate in the event he or she decides to
terminate the credit card.
e. Any other consideration deemed relevant by the judge
of probate.
(c) In the event a credit card provides rewards or
rebates based upon the use of the card, the earned rewards or
rebates shall be deposited in the Judge of Probate Fund.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB451 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 05-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 17-Mar-26 Passed



Page 3